Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3215
Practice of respiratory care; limitations.

The practice of respiratory care shall be performed only under the direction
of a medical director and upon the order of a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, a nurse
practitioner as defined in section 38-2312, or a certified registered nurse
anesthetist as defined in section 38-704.

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,230;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1081;

Laws 2012, LB788, § 2.